Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 32 Real Property

Editor's notes. —

Since no art. 1 of this chapter is set out in § 1, ch. 188, Laws 1977, arts. 2 to 5 have been redesignated as arts. 1 to 4 herein and the section numbers changed accordingly.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 (12 USCS §§ 2601 et seq.), 142 ALR Fed 511.

73 C.J.S. Property §§ 16 to 20.